Hawaii statutes.
§832-26 Nonwaiver by this State.
Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to constitute a waiver by this State of
its right, power, or privilege to try the demanded person for crime committed
within this State, or of its right, power, or privilege to regain custody of
the person by extradition proceedings or otherwise for the purpose of trial,
sentence, or punishment for any crime committed within this State, nor shall
any proceedings had under this chapter which result in, or fail to result in,
extradition be deemed a waiver by this State of any of its rights, privileges,
or jurisdiction in any way whatsoever. [L 1941, c 99, §26; RL 1945, §10656; RL
1955, §250-26; HRS §713-26; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next